Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-803
Pandering; evidence.

(1) Any person referred to in section 28-802 shall be a competent witness in any prosecution thereunder to testify to any and all matters, including conversation with the accused, or by the accused with third persons, in his presence, notwithstanding having married the accused either before or after the violation of any of the provisions of such section; and the act and state of marriage shall not be a defense to any violation of such section.

(2) Pandering shall be an exception to the husband-wife privilege as provided in section 27-505.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 159;

Laws 1978, LB 748, § 12.